Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.061

License fees—Real estate commission account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

All fees required under this chapter shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 and shall be paid to the state treasurer. All fees paid under the provisions of this chapter shall be placed in the real estate commission account in the state treasury. All money derived from fines imposed under this chapter shall be deposited in the real estate education program account created in RCW 18.85.321. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennium [biennia], the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the real estate commission account.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 914; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 955; 2008 c 23 s 29; 1993 c 50 s 1; 1991 c 277 s 1; 1987 c 332 s 8; 1967 c 22 s 1; 1953 c 235 s 11; 1941 c 252 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-30. Formerly RCW 18.85.220.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—1993 c 50: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 50 s 5.]

Effective date—1991 c 277: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1991 c 277 s 3.]